Tennessee, session 114, HB1982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-19-111(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "eighteen (18)" and substituting "sixteen (16)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1982
011684
- 1 -